Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Conduct of Trial; Verdict

Cross references. —

As to applicability of civil procedure provisions to conduct of criminal trial, see §

7-11-204

.

As to special verdicts and interrogatories, see Rule 49, W.R.C.P.

As to instructions to jury and exceptions, see Rule 51, W.R.C.P.

Statutory provisions for care and conduct of jury in capital cases are mandatory,

and failure to comply substantially with requirements will entitle defendant to new trial, unless it reasonably appears no prejudice resulted. Nicholson v. State, 18 Wyo. 298, 106 P. 929,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1910).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Jury §§ 220 to 345; 75 Am. Jur. 2d Trial §§ 180 to 257, 1077 to 1692.

50 C.J.S. Juries §§ 269 to 296; 88 C.J.S. Trial §§ 91 to 140, 415, 431 to 485, 775 to 777, 779 to 782, 784, 786 to 841, 843, 845 to 902, 908, 909.

§ 1-11-201.
Oath of jurors; jury ordered into custody.

As soon as the jury is
selected an oath shall be administered to the jurors that they will
truly try the matter in issue between
. . . . . , the plaintiff, and
. . . . . , the defendant, and render a true verdict according
to the evidence. After the oath has been administered and the jury
fully empaneled, the court shall order the jury into the custody of
the officer selected by the court. The jurors shall not separate from
the custody of the officer until they have been duly discharged, unless
by the consent of the parties to the action. The officer shall provide
for suitable quarters and food for the jury pending the trial.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 69, § 24; R.S. 1887, § 2552; R.S. 1899, § 3643; C.S. 1910, § 4498; C.S. 1920, § 5768; R.S. 1931, § 89-1305; C.S. 1945, § 3-2402; W.S. 1957, § 1-118; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

See also §

1-11-207

concerning custody of jurors during deliberations.

As to oath of jurors in criminal cases, see §

7-11-107

.

Presumption of compliance. —

In the absence of anything to the contrary of which the court on appeal may properly take notice, it will be presumed that the court complied with its duty under this section to order the jury into the custody of an officer when they are not allowed to separate. Wallace v. Skinner, 15 Wyo. 233, 88 P. 221,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1907).

Where separation of or opportunity to communicate with jury
shown. —

When defendant in capital case has shown separation of jury or opportunity for other parties, especially witnesses, to communicate with them, and it appears defendant was prejudiced or when it does not appear he was not prejudiced, new trial should be granted. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

New trial is properly refused because members of jury which had been ordered to be kept together went home for a short time by permission of a bailiff, it being satisfactorily shown that the separation did not serve as the occasion for the exercise of improper influences and that no one was prejudiced thereby. Cronberg Bros. v. Johnson, 29 Wyo. 11, 208 P. 446,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1922).

Juror's affidavits are admissible

in capital case showing that no prejudice resulted from their misconduct, and if presumption of prejudice is thereby overcome, new trial should be denied. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

Where deputy sheriff commingled with jurors but juror's affidavits showed he did not discuss anything with jurors relating to case, no ground for new trial was shown. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

But not necessarily considered on appeal. —

Juror's affidavits relating to alleged misconduct and to newspaper accounts of case read by them pending trial, which were not seen by district court, nor part of record on appeal and were not agreed to by state, will not be considered by supreme court. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

Bailiff's duties. —

While a trial judge erred in allowing an officer who participated in an investigation of defendant to act as bailiff during defendant's trial, the error was harmless because there was absolutely no evidence in the record that the bailiff did anything as bailiff other than the routine, administrative matters the bailiff was charged with performing.
Majors v. State, 2011 WY 63, 252 P.3d 435,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to jurors, 18 ALR2d 268.

§ 1-11-202.
Peremptory challenges allowed.

In the trial of civil
cases in the district courts of this state, each side is allowed three
(3) peremptory challenges.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 70, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 2549; C.S. 1945, § 3-2404; W.S. 1957, § 1-120; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to peremptory challenges in criminal cases, see §

7-11-103

.

Allocation of peremptory challenges in multi-party context.

—

In a termination of parental rights proceeding, it was an abuse of discretion to grant a guardian ad litem (GAL) and a Department of Family Services (Department) separate peremptory challenges because the positions of the GAL and Department were not antagonistic. In re LDB, 2019 WY 127, 454 P.3d 908,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 12

9

(Wyo. 2019); Swenson v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In re: LCH), 2019 WY 13, 434 P.3d 100,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2019).

Prior to alloting peremptory challenges under this section, the trial judge should consider all the relevant circumstances to determine whether a good faith controversy exists among multi-party defendants regarding an issue of fact which the jury will decide. Wardell v. McMillan, 844 P.2d 1052,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1992).

Objection to allocation of peremptory challenges waived.—

Parent could not attack the jury verdict on the basis of an improper allocation of peremptory challenges because the record failed to reveal which jurors the parent desired to empanel, that the state agency or guardian ad litem excluded. The record also failed to disclose which jurors, if any, the parent would have challenged had the parent been allotted additional peremptory challenges because at no point did the parent’s counsel object to the allocation of peremptory challenges, as counsel instead stated that counsel had no such objections. Harmon v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re DKS), 2020 WY 12, 456 P.3d 918,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2020).

Standard of review applicable to allocation of peremptory challenges among multiple parties

is an abuse of discretion standard. Cargill v. Mountain Cement Co., 891 P.2d 57,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1995).

A jury verdict will not be reversed, due to improper allocation of peremptory challenges, unless the challenging party can point to some convincing indication in the record that if a further peremptory challenge had been allowed, the party meant to challenge one or more jurors. Cargill v. Mountain Cement Co., 891 P.2d 57,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1995).

Objection to number of peremptory challenges waived. —

Where two defendants in a civil action were awarded a total of six peremptory challenges and plaintiffs were awarded four, plaintiffs' objection on appeal was not preserved, as plaintiffs did not complain that plaintiffs were given insufficient peremptory challenges at trial and did not make this point at the time the jury was empaneled or take any action at all to put the trial court on notice of plaintiffs' dissatisfaction. Smyth v. Kaufman, 2003 WY 52, 67 P.3d 1161,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — The United States Supreme Court on Gender-Based Peremptory Jury Challenges — Constitutionally Correct But Out of Touch With Reality: Litigants Beware! J.E.B. v. Alabama ex rel. T. B., 144 S. Ct. 1419 (1994),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 195 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Peremptory challenge after acceptance of juror, 3 ALR2d 499.

Use of peremptory challenge to exclude from jury persons belonging to specific race or class, 4 ALR2d 1200.

Waiver of peremptory challenge or challenges in civil cases other than by acceptance of juror, 56 ALR2d 742.

Effect of allowing excessive number of peremptory challenges, 95 ALR2d 957.

Number of peremptory challenges allowable where there are 2 or more parties on same side, 32 ALR3d 747.

Use of peremptory challenge to exclude from jury persons belonging to a class or race, 79 ALR3d 14.

Racial or ethnic prejudice of prospective jurors as proper subject of inquiry or ground of challenge on voir dire in state criminal case, 94 ALR3d 15.

Use of peremptory challenges to exclude Caucasian persons, as a racial group, from criminal jury-post-Batson state cases, 47 ALR5th 259.

Use of peremptory challenges to exclude persons from criminal jury based on religious affiliation — post-Batson state cases, 63 ALR5th 375.

§ 1-11-203.
Challenges for cause; grounds.

Challenges for cause may be taken on one (1) or more of the following grounds:

A lack of any of the qualifications prescribed by statute which render a person competent as a juror;

Relationship by consanguinity or affinity within the third degree to either party;

Standing in the relation of debtor or creditor, guardian or ward, master or servant, or principal or agent to either party, or being a partner united in business with either party, or being security on any bond or obligation for either party;

Having served as a juror or a witness in a previous trial between the same parties for the same cause of action, or being then a witness therein;

Interest on the part of the juror in the event or question involved in the action, but not an interest of the juror as a member or citizen of a municipal corporation;

Having formed or expressed an unqualified opinion or belief as to the merits or the main question of the action. The reading of newspaper accounts of the subject matter before the court shall not disqualify the juror either for bias or opinion;

The existence of a state of mind in the juror evincing enmity or bias for either party.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 69, § 26; R.S. 1887, § 2550; R.S. 1899, § 3641; C.S. 1910, § 4496; C.S. 1920, § 5766; R.S. 1931, § 89-1303; C.S. 1945, § 3-2405; W.S. 1957, § 1-121; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications of jurors, see §

1-11-101

.

As to challenges for cause in criminal cases, see §§

7-11-104

and

7-11-105

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Involvement in personal injury litigation. —

While it is not a statutory ground for challenge in a personal injury action for cause that a juror or his family has been involved in personal injury litigation, such information may lead to further questions to determine if such involvement has caused the juror to form such an attitude or opinion so as not to be fair and impartial. Vivion v. Brittain, 510 P.2d 21,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1973).

Effect of relationship not specified as disqualification. —

Where there was a relationship of attorney and client between a prospective juror's father, whose business was managed by the juror, and the law firm of an attorney representing the defendant, held under this section, which does not specify such a relationship as a disqualification of a prospective juror, that any bias or prejudice which might be said to result from such a relationship was, at the most, only a rebuttable presumption and that the fairness and impartiality of the juror is a matter of fact to be determined by the trial court in the exercise of its sound discretion. Krahn v. Pierce, 485 P.2d 1021,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1971).

Speculative bias will not result in successful challenge

if the trial court determines that the prospective juror is able to decide the case solely on the evidence presented and according to the trial court's instructions on the law. Schwenke v. State, 768 P.2d 1031,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1989).

Review. —

Where plaintiffs' attorney passed jury panel for cause, plaintiffs could not establish reversible error from court's denial of their challenges of three veniremen for cause. McGhee v. Rork, 978 P.2d 577,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1999).

Quoted

in

Lopez v. State, 544 P.2d 855,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1976); Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981); Jahnke v. State, 682 P.2d 991,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1984); Summers v. State, 725 P.2d 1033,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1986); Russell v. State, 851 P.2d 1274,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1993); Smith v. State, 2008 WY 98, 190 P.3d 522,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Aug. 19, 2008); Smith v. State, 2009 WY 2, 199 P.3d 1052,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Jan. 13, 2009).

Cited

in

Redwine v. Fitzhugh, 78 Wyo. 407, 329 P.2d 257,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 24

, 72 A.L.R.2d 664 (1958); Wardell v. McMillan, 844 P.2d 1052,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1992); Ormsby v. Dana Kepner Co. of Wyo., 997 P.2d 465,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — The United States Supreme Court on Gender-Based Peremptory Jury Challenges — Constitutionally Correct But Out of Touch With Reality: Litigants Beware! J.E.B. v. Alabama ex rel. T. B., 144 S. Ct. 1419 (1994),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 195 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Questions to jury in personal injury or death action as to interest in or connection with indemnity insurance company, 4 ALR2d 761.

Effect of juror's false or erroneous answer on voir dire in personal injury or death action as to previous claims or actions for damages by himself or his family, 38 ALR2d 624.

Effect of false or erroneous answer on voir dire as to previous claims or actions against himself or his family, 63 ALR2d 1061.

Professional or business relations between proposed juror and attorney as ground of challenge for cause, 72 ALR2d 673.

Previous knowledge of facts of civil case by juror as disqualification, 73 ALR2d 1312.

Relationship (consanguinity or affinity) of juror to witness in civil case as ground of disqualification, 85 ALR2d 851.

Effect of social or business relationship between proposed juror and nonparty witness on qualification of juror, 11 ALR3d 859.

Claustrophobia or other neurosis of juror as subject of inquiry on voir dire or of disqualification of juror, 20 ALR3d 1420.

Racial or ethnic prejudice of prospective jurors as proper subject of inquiry or ground of challenge on voir dire in state criminal case, 94 ALR3d 15.

Religious belief, affiliation or prejudice of prospective juror as proper subject of inquiry or ground for challenge on voir dire, 95 ALR3d 172.

Professional or business relations between proposed juror and attorney as ground for challenge for cause, 52 ALR4th 964.

Effect of juror's false or erroneous answer on voir dire regarding previous claims or actions against himself or his family, 66 ALR4th 509.

Prospective juror's connection with insurance company as ground for challenge for cause, 9 ALR5th 102.

Propriety of inquiry on voir dire as to juror's attitude toward, or acquaintance with literature dealing with, amount of damage awards, 63 ALR5th 285.

Examination and challenge of federal case jurors on basis of attitudes toward homosexuality, 85 ALR Fed 864.

§ 1-11-204.
Challenges for cause; trial.

All challenges for cause
shall be tried by the court, and the juror challenged, and any other
persons may be examined as witnesses upon the trial of the challenge.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 70, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 2551; R.S. 1899, § 3642; C.S. 1910, § 4497; C.S. 1920, § 5767; R.S. 1931, § 89-1304; C.S. 1945, § 3-2407; W.S. 1957, § 1-123; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to trial of challenges in criminal cases, see §

7-11-104

.

§ 1-11-205.
Order of trial.

When the jury has been sworn, the trial shall proceed in the following order, unless the court for good cause otherwise directs:

The party who has the burden of the issues may briefly state his case and the evidence by which he expects to sustain it;

The adverse party may then briefly state his defense and the evidence he expects to offer in support of it;

The party who has the burden of the issues shall first produce his evidence, the adverse party will then produce his evidence;

The parties will then be confined to rebutting evidence unless the court permits them to offer evidence in their original case;

When the evidence is concluded, and either party desires special instructions to be given to the jury, the instructions shall be reduced to writing, numbered and signed by the party or his attorney asking the same, and delivered to the court;

Before argument of the cause is begun, the court shall give such instructions of the law to the jury as may be necessary. The instructions shall be in writing, numbered and signed by the judge;

Where either party asks special instructions to be given to the jury, the court shall either give such instructions as requested, give the instructions with modifications, or refuse to give them. The court shall mark each instruction offered so that it shall appear which instructions were given in whole or in part, and which were refused, so that either party may except to the instructions as given, refused or modified. All instructions given by the court together with those refused shall be filed as a part of the record.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 213; R.S. 1887, § 2553; R.S. 1899, § 3644; C.S. 1910, § 4499; C.S. 1920, § 5769; R.S. 1931, § 89-1306; C.S. 1945, § 3-2408; W.S. 1957, § 1-124; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to order of trial in criminal cases, see §

7-11-201

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Rebuttal evidence. —

The court has discretion in admitting evidence admissible during a party's case in chief when offered in rebuttal. Davis v. Consolidated Oil & Gas, 802 P.2d 840,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. Jan. 11, 1991).

Duty of court to instruct. —

It is duty of court, under §

7-11-201

, to instruct jury on essential law of the case and of such matters of law without which defendant will not receive fair trial, or without which jury of laymen would be apt to go wrong. Gardner v. State, 27 Wyo. 316, 196 P. 750,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1921).

Jury to receive instructions in court. —

Where after the jury made known its desire to be informed concerning a part of the law arising in the case, the requirement of the statute to “conduct them to the court where information upon the matter of law shall be given” was not followed, nor was the instruction made part of the record as required by subsection (a)(vii) of this section and even though an objection was not made thereto (in fact, there is indication to the contrary, i.e., that it was done with the approval of counsel), there was plain error in the proceedings. Rissler & McMurry v. Snodgrass, 854 P.2d 69,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. July 20, 1993).

Failure to instruct held not prejudicial. —

In prosecution for murder committed during attempted robbery, where no instruction defining robbery was asked for and no exception taken, held, that failure to give such instruction was not prejudicial, especially where there was no lack of proof of attempt to commit robbery. Harris v. State, 34 Wyo. 175, 242 P. 411,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1926). See Rule 30, W.R.Cr.P.

Instructions become part of record. —

Under this section instructions, when offered in writing, numbered, noted and signed by the judge and returned with the original papers, become a part of the record and need not be embodied in a bill of exceptions to be considered on appeal. Stoner v. Mau, 11 Wyo. 366, 72 P. 193, 73 P. 548,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1903).

Failure of court to number and sign instructions

given in a case, as required by this section, was without prejudice, there being no suggestion that any of the instructions which were given escaped, or that others crept into, the record. Keffer v. State, 12 Wyo. 49, 73 P. 556,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1903).

Instruction on contributory negligence. —

In action by employee against employer for personal injuries, with evidence to sustain allegations of the answer that plaintiff knew of the danger, and that it was unnecessary for him to go to the place where it existed and accident occurred, and only instructions on contributory negligence were in regard to plaintiff's going to the place of the accident contrary to the rules of his employer, question of contributory negligence, independent of any rule of the company, should have been submitted to the jury, under proper instructions, though the instruction requested did not state the law accurately. Union Pac. R.R. v. Jarvi, 3 Wyo. 375, 3 Wyo. 376, 23 P. 398,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1890).

Preserving exceptions. —

It is not necessary to preserve properly exceptions to an instruction to state the specific grounds thereof in a bill of exceptions, the usual practice being to state such grounds when first objecting to proposed instructions, without incorporating them in the record, a continued reliance upon the record objection being usually indicated by merely announcing that the party excepts to the giving of the instructions at the time it is given, the jury being instructed upon the law of the case in civil actions, before proceeding with the arguments of counsel. Hall Oil Co. v. Barquin, 29 Wyo. 440, 213 P. 941,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1923). See Rule 46 and 75, W.R.C.P.

Duty to state issues to jury. —

This section does not, in specific terms, require court to state issues to the jury, but that duty may no doubt be implied, when necessary, to a fair and intelligent consideration of the cause by the jury from the statutory requirement that “before the argument of the case is begun, the court shall give such instructions upon the law to the jury as may be necessary.” Wallace v. Skinner, 15 Wyo. 233, 88 P. 221,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1907).

Communications of administrative directives to jury. —

The status of communications between the judge and the jury that do not involve instructions on the law can be characterized as administrative directives, and the harmless error doctrine applies to such communications. Carlson v. Carlson, 888 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1995).

Clarifying communications with jury held proper. —

Where jurors sent the trial court a note asking, “If we cannot find solid proof of trespass, can we award damages?” and it answered “No” without the parties' counsel being present, plaintiffs were not entitled to new trial because (1) answering the question with a definitive “No” left no room for further confusion or undue emphasis on any particular instructions, (2) the jurors had been properly instructed on the burden of proof, and (3) the question did not indicate that the jury was confused about what “preponderance of the evidence” meant. Beck v. Townsend, 2005 WY 84, 116 P.3d 465,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2005).

Inconsistent findings. —

Plaintiff was injured while assisting J. and E. in lowering an engine in defendant's shop under the orders of the gang “boss.” The jury found that in consequence of an order given by the “boss,” J. did not assist in removing the last timber from under the engine and that in consequence of his failure so to assist the accident occurred, and to that extent, the “boss” and J. were found negligent. They also found that three men were generally employed to do the work referred to, though two, one being in the pit under the engine, could do the work. Held, that the findings were inconsistent. McBride v. Union Pac. R.R., 3 Wyo. 247, 21 P. 687,

1889 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1889).

The finding that two men were sufficient and that two were furnished does not warrant a judgment for defendant, it being inconsistent with the finding that the accident occurred in consequence of the third man being ordered away, and to strike out the latter and give effect to the former would be making a new verdict. McBride v. Union Pac. R.R., 3 Wyo. 247, 21 P. 687,

1889 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1889).

Directed verdicts. —

A verdict cannot be based upon mere guess or conjecture if intelligent minds may not draw therefrom different conclusions upon the question of negligence, and it is the duty of the court to direct a verdict unless the conflict is positive. Galicich v. Oregon Short Line R.R., 54 Wyo. 123, 87 P.2d 27,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1939). See Rule 50, W.R.C.P.

Where plaintiff sued for diversion of water from his irrigating ditch and during plaintiff's cross-examination defendant introduced written contract tending to show joint ownership of himself with defendant, and then moved for the direction of a verdict before plaintiff's evidence was all in on the ground that irrigation statute provided a specific remedy to determine the right of joint owners, which was exclusive, it was error to direct the verdict, such action being directly contrary to this section, prescribing the mode of trial, and giving plaintiff the right to introduce evidence in support of his case and also in rebuttal. Mau v. Stoner, 10 Wyo. 125, 67 P. 618,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1902).

Cited

in

Spriggs v. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc., 63 Wyo. 416, 182 P.2d 801,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1947); Stringer v. Board of County Comm'rs, 347 P.2d 197,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1959); Stauffer Chem. Co. v. Curry, 778 P.2d 1083,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1989); Natural Gas Processing Co. v. Hull, 886 P.2d 1181,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1994); Sutherland v. State, 944 P.2d 1157,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Prejudicial effect of judge's disclosure to jury, in civil case, of motions or proceedings in chamber, 77 ALR2d 1253.

Suggestion by judge during trial as to advisability of compromise, 6 ALR3d 1457.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of instructions in civil case as affected by the manner in which they are written, 10 ALR3d 501.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of sending written instructions with retiring jury in civil case, 91 ALR3d 336.

Propriety of trial court order limiting time for opening or closing argument in civil case — state cases, 71 ALR4th 130.

Order of closing argument in federal civil trials, 53 ALR Fed 900.

§ 1-11-206.
View of property or place by jury.

When the court considers
it proper for the jurors to view the property which is the subject
of litigation or the place in which any material fact occurred, it
may order them to be conducted in a body under the charge of an officer
to the place which shall be shown to them by a person appointed by
the court for that purpose. While the jurors are absent no person
other than the person so appointed shall speak to them on any subject
connected with the trial.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 214; R.S. 1887, § 2554; R.S. 1899, § 3645; C.S. 1910, § 4500; C.S. 1920, § 5770; R.S. 1931, § 89-1307; C.S. 1945, § 3-2409; W.S. 1957, § 1-125; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Personal appearance to establish damage. —

When party expects to rely in part on his personal appearance in court for purpose of establishing element of damage, the matter should be brought into the record by some appropriate question. Northwest States Utils. Co. v. Ashton, 51 Wyo. 168, 65 P.2d 235,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 51 Wyo. 166, 69 P.2d 623,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1937).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Prejudicial effect of misconduct by one other than juror during authorized view by jury, 45 ALR2d 1128.

Prejudicial effect of acts of jurors in viewing premises with witnesses, 52 ALR2d 182.

Prejudicial effect of acts of jurors in viewing premises with witnesses, 58 ALR2d 177.

Prejudicial effect of indicating to jury a party's desire for view by jury, 76 ALR2d 766.

Propriety of permitting view by jury, in civil personal injury or death action, as affected by claimed change since accident or incident, 85 ALR2d 512.

Prejudicial effect of unauthorized view by jury of scene of accident or premises in question, 11 ALR3d 918.

§ 1-11-207.
Decision or deliberation by jury; duty of officer in charge of jury.

When the case is submitted,
the jury may decide in court or retire for deliberation. If the jurors
retire, they shall be kept together in some convenient place under
the charge of an officer until they agree upon a verdict or are discharged
by the court. The court may permit them to separate temporarily at
night or at their meals. The officer having them under his charge
shall not allow any communication to be made to them nor make any
himself except to ask them if they have agreed upon their verdict,
unless by order of the court. He shall not communicate to any person
the state of their deliberations or the verdict agreed upon before
their verdict is rendered.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 215; R.S. 1887, § 2555; R.S. 1899, § 3646; C.S. 1910, § 4501; C.S. 1920, § 5771; R.S. 1931, § 89-1308; C.S. 1945, § 3-2410; W.S. 1957, § 1-126; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duty of officer in charge of jury, see §

1-11-201

.

Where separation of or opportunity to communicate with jury
shown. —

When defendant in capital case has shown separation of jury or opportunity for other parties, especially witnesses, to communicate with them, and it appears defendant was prejudiced or when it does not appear he was not prejudiced, new trial should be granted. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

Where a witness who mingled with the jury was a police officer and also a principal witness for the prosecution, and therefore a part of the prosecution team, and no inquiry was made of the jury members to determine if communications between the witness and themselves were such as to be not prejudicial to the defendant, the trial court should have granted the defendant's motion for mistrial on the grounds of jury conduct. Romo v. State, 500 P.2d 678,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1972).

Juror's affidavits are admissible

in capital case showing that no prejudice resulted from their misconduct, and if presumption of prejudice is thereby overcome, new trial should be denied. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

Where deputy sheriff commingled with jurors but juror's affidavits showed he did not discuss anything with jurors relating to case, no ground for new trial was shown. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

But not necessarily considered on appeal. —

Juror's affidavits relating to alleged misconduct and to newspaper accounts of case read by them pending trial which were not seen by district court, nor part of record on appeal and where not agreed to by state will not be considered by supreme court. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

Receipt of mail by juror error. —

In a homicide case it was reversible error to allow a juror to receive mail during the trial. State v. Eldredge, 45 Wyo. 488, 21 P.2d 545,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1933).

Bailiff's duties. —

While a trial judge erred in allowing an officer who participated in an investigation of defendant to act as bailiff during defendant's trial, the error was harmless because there was absolutely no evidence in the record that the bailiff did anything as bailiff other than the routine, administrative matters the bailiff was charged with performing.
Majors v. State, 2011 WY 63, 252 P.3d 435,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2011).

Deadlocked jury.—

Although the bailiffs should not have told the district court judge how the deadlocked jurors had voted, when the judge had not asked the bailiffs for that information, the district court's knowledge of that vote did not render the court's supplemental instruction urging the jury to continue deliberating unduly coercive. Carter v. State, 2016 WY 36, 369 P.3d 220,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2016).

Applied

in

State v. Hambrick, 65 Wyo. 1, 196 P.2d 661,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1948).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Prejudicial effect of court direction or caution to party witness not to discuss case with anyone including his counsel during recess or the like, 46 ALR2d 517.

Right to have reporter's notes read to jury, 50 ALR2d 176.

Prejudicial effect, in civil case, of communication between witnesses and jurors, 52 ALR2d 182.

Propriety and effect of jury in civil case taking depositions to jury room during deliberations, 57 ALR2d 1011.

Presence of alternate juror in jury room, 84 ALR2d 1288.

Tests or experiments in jury room, 95 ALR2d 351.

Discussion, during jury deliberation, of possible insurance coverage as prejudicial misconduct, 47 ALR3d 1299.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of trial court's inquiry as to numerical division of jury, 77 ALR3d 769.

Prejudicial effect of jury's procurement or use of book during deliberations in criminal cases, 35 ALR4th 626.

Communication between court officials or attendants and jurors in criminal trial as ground for mistrial or reversal — post-Parker cases, 35 ALR4th 890.

Prejudicial effect, in civil case, of communications between court officials or attendants and jurors, 31 ALR5th 572.

Prejudicial effect, in civil case, of communications between judges and jurors, 33 ALR5th 205.

Taking and use of trial notes by jury, 36 ALR5th 255.

§ 1-11-208.
Admonition to jurors when permitted to separate.

If the jurors are permitted
to separate during the trial or after the case is submitted to them,
they shall be admonished by the court that it is their duty not to
converse with nor allow themselves to be addressed by any person on
any subject of the trial, and that they are not to form or express
an opinion until the cause is finally submitted to them.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 216; R.S. 1887, § 2556; R.S. 1899, § 3647; C.S. 1910, § 4502; C.S. 1920, § 5772; R.S. 1931, § 89-1309; C.S. 1945, § 3-2411; W.S. 1957, § 1-127; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Separation or dispersal of jury after submission of civil case, 77 ALR2d 1086.